California, session 20252026, AB678.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8257.3 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:8257.3. (a) The council shall coordinate with representatives from LGBTQ+ communities, including, but not limited to, housing providers, nonprofit organizations, advocates, and researchers, to do all of the following:(1) Identify recommended policies and best practices for providing inclusive and culturally competent services to LGBTQ+ people experiencing homelessness.(2) Develop recommendations to do all of the following:(A) Provide education, training, and resources to improve culturally competent services for LGBTQ+ people in state homelessness programs.(B) Expand data collection to understand the needs and experiences of LGBTQ+ people in state homelessness programs.(C) Prevent discrimination, harassment, and violence against members of the LGBTQ+ community in state homelessness programs.(b) For purposes of this section, “state homelessness programs” means those programs that are funded, in whole or in part, by the state with the express purpose of addressing or preventing homelessness or providing services to people experiencing homelessness.(c) Notwithstanding Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before July 1, 2027, the council shall submit a report on the recommendations required by subdivision (a) to the Assembly Committee on Housing and Community Development and the Senate Committee on Housing, or their successor committees.